Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There are appropriated to the Department of Justice,  for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the  following amounts for the following pur-
poses:
(1) Appellate Division ..................... $ 317,395
(2) Civil Enforcement Division ....... $ 700,777
(3) Criminal Justice Division.......... $ 13,685,070
(4) Crime Victims’ Services
Division..................................... $ 7,897,096
(5) Defense of Criminal
Convictions................................ $ 23,635,069
(6) Division of Child Support .......... $ 28,060,876
(7) Debt service and related
costs .......................................... $ 9,294,608
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of  Justice,
for the following purposes:
(1) Office of the Attorney
General and administration ...... $ 36,088,056
(2) Appellate Division ..................... $ 20,954,182
(3) Civil Enforcement Division ....... $ 79,415,670
(4) Criminal Justice Division.......... $ 14,483,746
(5) Crime Victims’ Services
Division..................................... $ 34,154,612
(6) General Counsel Division .......... $ 55,198,520
(7) Trial Division ............................ $ 32,816,489
(8) Division of Child Support .......... $ 32,359,440
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
Enrolled House Bill 5015 (HB 5015-A) Page 1
of expenses  from federal funds collected or received by the Department of Justice for the
following purposes:
(1) Civil Enforcement Division ....... $ 4,446,638
(2) Criminal Justice Division.......... $ 1,297,481
(3) Crime Victims’ Services
Division..................................... $ 34,465,155
(4) Division of Child Support .......... $109,730,404
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by House June 26, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 30, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5015 (HB 5015-A) Page 2